Utah statutes.
17-22-8.   Care of prisoners -- Funding of services -- Private contractor.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the sheriff shall:
(a)  receive all persons committed to jail by competent authority; and
(b)  provide them with necessary food, clothing, and bedding in the manner
prescribed by the county legislative body.
(2)  The expense incurred in providing these services to prisoners shall be
paid from the county treasury, except as provided in Section 17-22-10.
(3)  If the county executive contracts with a private contractor to provide
the services required by this section, the sheriff shall provide only those
services required of him by the contract between the county and the private
contractor.
